District of Columbia statutes.
42-3636

Complaint by affected tenant or resident association.

Expired.

History

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-139, § 7, 37 DCR 2645

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2559.6.

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 8-139

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3631.